Florida, session 2026, SB408.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âSubsection (4) is added to section 499.0054, 15 Florida Statutes, to read: 16 499.0054âAdvertising and labeling of drugs, devices, and 17 cosmetics; exemptions.â 18 (4)(a)âAs used in this subsection, the term âadvertiseâ 19 means a media communication, including, but not limited to, 20 television, radio, print, the Internet, digital or electronic 21 media, product placement, promotion by an influencer in exchange 22 for compensation, or any other manner of paid promotion, that a 23 vaccine manufacturer purchases to promote the manufacturerâs 24 vaccine. The term does not include: 25 1.âAny discussion between a health care provider and the 26 providerâs patient or any written materials that a health care 27 provider provides to a patient concerning a vaccine; or 28 2.âAny posters, decorations, or other materials or 29 promotional items concerning a vaccine that are displayed in or 30 made available by a health care facility, health care providerâs 31 office, or other clinical setting. 32 (b)âA manufacturer is liable to an individual if the 33 manufacturer advertises a vaccine in this state and the 34 advertised vaccine causes harm or injury to an individual. 35 (c)âNotwithstanding any other law to the contrary, an 36 individual may bring an action under this section within 3 years 37 following the accrual of the cause of action. 38 (d)âA court shall award a claimant who prevails in an 39 action brought under this section actual damages, court costs, 40 and reasonable attorney fees. 41 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.